NetSpell/src/NetSpell.DictionaryBuild.Tests/Data/Samples/ro_RO.aff
# comment line
SET UTF-8
TRY iaăâșțîertolncusmpdbgfzvhjxkwyqACDM
KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjkl|zxcvbnm

# comment line
PFX o Y 1
PFX o 0 auto .

# comment line
# comment line
SFX t Y 3
SFX t 0 u eț
SFX t 0 ul eț
SFX t 0 ului eț

# comment line
# comment line
SFX e Y 2
SFX e 0 le e
SFX e 0 lui e

# comment line
PFX e Y 1
PFX e 0 ne .

# comment line
REP 2
REP ce che
REP ci chi
